src/derivation/crk-drv.lexc
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ê:@P.infl.NONTERM@ê F2F ;
@P.infl.PrI@-ê:@P.infl.PrI@ê F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ê:@P.infl.VAI-v@ê F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-ê:@P.infl.VII-v@ê F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-4@-ê:@P.infl.VTA-4@ê F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-2@-ê:@P.infl.VTI-2@ê F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ê(h)t:@P.infl.NONTERM@êt F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-êh:@P.infl.VTA-1@êh F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-êhk:@P.infl.IPC@êhk F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-êhki:@P.infl.IPC@êhki F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@-êhkâk:@P.infl.PrA@êhkâk F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@-êhâ:@P.infl.PrA@êhâ F2F ;
@P.infl.PrI@-êhâ:@P.infl.PrI@êhâ F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-êkin:@P.infl.NONTERM@êkin F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@-êkinw:@P.infl.NA-3@êkinw F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-3@-êkinw:@P.infl.NI-3@êkinw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-êkinw:@P.infl.NONTERM@êkinw F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-êkâni:@P.infl.IPC@êkâni F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ên:@P.infl.NONTERM@ên F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ênaw:@P.infl.NONTERM@ênaw F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-2@-ênaw:@P.infl.VTA-2@ênaw F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-ês:@P.infl.IPC@ês F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-ês(k):@P.infl.IPC@ês F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-3@-êskw:@P.infl.NI-3@êskw F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-êsê:@P.infl.VAI-v@êsê F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-êsîs:@P.infl.IPC@êsîs F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-êsîs:@P.infl.NA-1@êsîs F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-êwê:@P.infl.NONTERM@êwê F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-êwê:@P.infl.VAI-v@êwê F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-êyas:@P.infl.IPC@êyas F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-êyask:@P.infl.IPC@êyask F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-êyati:@P.infl.VAI-v@êyati F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-êyatin:@P.infl.VII-n@êyatin F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-êyâ:@P.infl.NONTERM@êyâ F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-êyâ:@P.infl.VII-v@êyâ F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@-êyâpiy:@P.infl.NA-2@êyâpiy F2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-2@-êyâpiy:@P.infl.NDI-2@êyâpiy F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@-êyâpiy:@P.infl.NI-2@êyâpiy F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-êyâpiy:@P.infl.NONTERM@êyâpiy F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-êýiht:@P.infl.NONTERM@êýiht F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-êýiht:@P.infl.VTI-1@êýiht F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-êýim:@P.infl.NONTERM@êýim F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-êýim:@P.infl.VTA-1@êýim F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-î:@P.infl.NONTERM@î F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-î:@P.infl.VAI-v@î F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-î:@P.infl.VII-v@î F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-îc:@P.infl.NONTERM@îc F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-îh:@P.infl.NONTERM@îh F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-îh:@P.infl.VTA-1@îh F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-îhk:@P.infl.NONTERM@îhk F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-îhk:@P.infl.VTI-1@îhk F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-2@-îhkaw:@P.infl.VTA-2@îhkaw F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-îhkât:@P.infl.VTI-1@îhkât F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-îht:@P.infl.NONTERM@îht F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-îkwan:@P.infl.NA-1@îkwan F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-îmo:@P.infl.NONTERM@îmo F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-îmo:@P.infl.VAI-v@îmo F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-îs:@P.infl.IPC@îs F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-îs:@P.infl.NONTERM@îs F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ô:@P.infl.NONTERM@ô F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ô:@P.infl.VAI-v@ô F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ôhk:@P.infl.NONTERM@ôhk F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ôm:@P.infl.NONTERM@ôm F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-ôm:@P.infl.VTA-1@ôm F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ôn:@P.infl.NONTERM@ôn F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-ôn:@P.infl.VTA-1@ôn F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-ôn:@P.infl.VTI-1@ôn F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ôpê:@P.infl.NONTERM@ôpê F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ôpê:@P.infl.VAI-v@ôpê F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-ôskân:@P.infl.IPC@ôskân F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-ôskân:@P.infl.NI-1@ôskân F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ôsê:@P.infl.NONTERM@ôsê F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ôsê:@P.infl.VAI-v@ôsê F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ôt:@P.infl.NONTERM@ôt F2F ;
@P.infl.VTI-1@-ôt:@P.infl.VTI-1@ôt F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-2@-ôtaw:@P.infl.VTA-2@ôtaw F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-ôtâhk:@P.infl.IPC@ôtâhk F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@-ôtêw:@P.infl.NA-2@ôtêw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ôtêw:@P.infl.NONTERM@ôtêw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ý:@P.infl.NONTERM@ý F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ýati:@P.infl.VAI-v@ýati F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-ýatin:@P.infl.VII-n@ýatin F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ýawêsi:@P.infl.VAI-v@ýawêsi F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ýi:@P.infl.NONTERM@ýi F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ýi:@P.infl.VAI-v@ýi F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-ýikohk:@P.infl.IPC@ýikohk F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ýikohk:@P.infl.NONTERM@ýikohk F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-ýâ:@P.infl.VII-v@ýâ F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ýâhoko:@P.infl.VAI-v@ýâhoko F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-ýâkan:@P.infl.NA-1@ýâkan F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-ýâkan:@P.infl.NI-1@ýâkan F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ýâkan:@P.infl.NONTERM@ýâkan F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ýâpawi:@P.infl.VAI-v@ýâpawi F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ýâsi:@P.infl.VAI-v@ýâsi F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ýâtisi:@P.infl.VAI-v@ýâtisi F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@[-w]:@P.infl.NONTERM@w F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@[-wi]:@P.infl.NONTERM@wi F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@{-ak}:@P.infl.IPC@ak F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@{-ak}:@P.infl.NA-2@ak F2F ;
@P.infl.PR@{-ak}:@P.infl.PR@ak F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@{-ak}:@P.infl.PrA@ak F2F ;
@P.infl.INM@{-amihk}:@P.infl.INM@amihk F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@{-amw}:@P.infl.NA-3@amw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-amw}:@P.infl.NONTERM@amw F2F ;
@P.infl.INM@{-am}:@P.infl.INM@am F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-am}:@P.infl.NONTERM@am F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@{-a}:@P.infl.IPC@a F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-4@{-a}:@P.infl.NA-4@a F2F ;
@P.infl.NDA-4@{-a}:@P.infl.NDA-4@a F2F ;
@P.infl.NDA-4w@{-a}:@P.infl.NDA-4w@a F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-a}:@P.infl.NONTERM@a F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@{-a}:@P.infl.PrA@a F2F ;
@P.infl.PrI@{-a}:@P.infl.PrI@a F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@{-a}:@P.infl.VAI-v@a F2F ;
@P.infl.INM@{-cik}:@P.infl.INM@cik F2F ;
@P.infl.INM@{-hk}:@P.infl.INM@hk F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@{-ihi}:@P.infl.PrA@ihi F2F ;
@P.infl.PrI@{-ihi}:@P.infl.PrI@ihi F2F ;
@P.infl.INM@{-ihk}:@P.infl.INM@ihk F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@{-ihk}:@P.infl.IPC@ihk F2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@{-ikaniwi}:@P.infl.VII-v@ikaniwi F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-iki}:@P.infl.NONTERM@iki F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@{-iki}:@P.infl.PrA@iki F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-iko}:@P.infl.NONTERM@iko F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@{-iko}:@P.infl.VAI-v@iko F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-2@{-iko}:@P.infl.VTA-2@iko F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@{-ikw}:@P.infl.NA-3@ikw F2F ;
@P.infl.NDA-3@{-ikw}:@P.infl.NDA-3@ikw F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-ikw}:@P.infl.NONTERM@ikw F2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-2@{-ikw}:@P.infl.VTA-2@ikw F2F ;
@P.infl.IPJ@{-ik}:@P.infl.IPJ@ik F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-im(a)}:@P.infl.NONTERM@im F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@{-ima}:@P.infl.IPC@ima F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-ima}:@P.infl.NONTERM@ima F2F ;
@P.infl.PrI@{-ima}:@P.infl.PrI@ima F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@{-inaw}:@P.infl.NA-2@inaw F2F ;
@P.infl.NDA-2@{-inaw}:@P.infl.NDA-2@inaw F2F ;
@P.infl.INM@{-inâhk}:@P.infl.INM@inâhk F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@{-inâhk}:@P.infl.IPC@inâhk F2F ;
@P.infl.INM@{-inânihk}:@P.infl.INM@inânihk F2F ;
@P.infl.IPJ@{-itik}:@P.infl.IPJ@itik F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@{-iwâw}:@P.infl.IPC@iwâw F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@{-i}:@P.infl.IPC@i F2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-4@{-i}:@P.infl.NDI-4@i F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-4@{-i}:@P.infl.NI-4@i F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-i}:@P.infl.NONTERM@i F2F ;
@P.infl.PR@{-i}:@P.infl.PR@i F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@{-i}:@P.infl.PrA@i F2F ;
@P.infl.PrI@{-i}:@P.infl.PrI@i F2F ;
@P.infl.PrI@{-iýiw}:@P.infl.PrI@iýiw F2F ;
@P.infl.INM@{-ki}:@P.infl.INM@ki F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@{-ki}:@P.infl.IPC@ki F2F ;
@P.infl.INM@{-k}:@P.infl.INM@k F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@{-k}:@P.infl.IPC@k F2F ;
@P.infl.IPH@{-k}:@P.infl.IPH@k F2F ;
@P.infl.IPJ@{-k}:@P.infl.IPJ@k F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-k}:@P.infl.NONTERM@k F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@{-k}:@P.infl.PrA@k F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@{-naw}:@P.infl.PrA@naw F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@{-nân}:@P.infl.PrA@nân F2F ;
@P.infl.INM@{-t}:@P.infl.INM@t F2F ;
@P.infl.INM@{-wak}:@P.infl.INM@wak F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@{-wak}:@P.infl.VAI-v@wak F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-wi}:@P.infl.NONTERM@wi F2F ;
@P.infl.INM@{-w}:@P.infl.INM@w F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@{-w}:@P.infl.IPC@w F2F ;
@P.infl.IPJ@{-w}:@P.infl.IPJ@w F2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@{-w}:@P.infl.NA-2@w F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@{-w}:@P.infl.NI-2@w F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-3@{-w}:@P.infl.NI-3@w F2F ;
@P.infl.NI-4@{-w}:@P.infl.NI-4@w F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-w}:@P.infl.NONTERM@w F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@{-wâw}:@P.infl.PrA@wâw F2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@{-yêk}:@P.infl.IPC@yêk F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-â}:@P.infl.NONTERM@â F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@{-â}:@P.infl.PrA@â F2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@{-â}:@P.infl.VAI-v@â F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@{-êhkâk}:@P.infl.PrA@êhkâk F2F ;
@P.infl.PrA@{-êhâ}:@P.infl.PrA@êhâ F2F ;
@P.infl.PrI@{-êhâ}:@P.infl.PrI@êhâ F2F ;
@P.infl.PrI@{-êhê}:@P.infl.PrI@êhê F2F ;
@P.infl.NDA-1@{-ê}:@P.infl.NDA-1@ê F2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@{-ê}:@P.infl.NONTERM@ê F2F ;
@P.infl.PrI@{-ê}:@P.infl.PrI@ê F2F ;

LEXICON F2F
/ Medials ;
/ Finals ;

LEXICON Parts-of-Speech
@R.infl.INM@+INM:@R.infl.INM@0 # ;
@R.infl.IPC@+IPC:@R.infl.IPC@0 # ;
@R.infl.IPH@+IPH:@R.infl.IPH@0 # ;
@R.infl.IPJ@+IPJ:@R.infl.IPJ@0 # ;
@R.infl.IPN@+IPN:@R.infl.IPN@0 # ;
@R.infl.IPP@+IPP:@R.infl.IPP@0 # ;
@R.infl.IPV@+IPV:@R.infl.IPV@0 # ;
@R.infl.NA-1@+NA-1:@R.infl.NA-1@0 # ;
@R.infl.NA-2@+NA-2:@R.infl.NA-2@0 # ;
@R.infl.NA-3@+NA-3:@R.infl.NA-3@0 # ;
@R.infl.NA-4@+NA-4:@R.infl.NA-4@0 # ;
@R.infl.NA-4w@+NA-4w:@R.infl.NA-4w@0 # ;
@R.infl.NA-?@+NA-?:@R.infl.NA-?@0 # ;
@R.infl.NDA-1@+NDA-1:@R.infl.NDA-1@0 # ;
@R.infl.NDA-2@+NDA-2:@R.infl.NDA-2@0 # ;
@R.infl.NDA-3@+NDA-3:@R.infl.NDA-3@0 # ;
@R.infl.NDA-4@+NDA-4:@R.infl.NDA-4@0 # ;
@R.infl.NDA-4w@+NDA-4w:@R.infl.NDA-4w@0 # ;
@R.infl.NDA-x@+NDA-x:@R.infl.NDA-x@0 # ;
@R.infl.NDI-1@+NDI-1:@R.infl.NDI-1@0 # ;
@R.infl.NDI-2@+NDI-2:@R.infl.NDI-2@0 # ;
@R.infl.NDI-3@+NDI-3:@R.infl.NDI-3@0 # ;
@R.infl.NDI-4@+NDI-4:@R.infl.NDI-4@0 # ;
@R.infl.NDI-?@+NDI-?:@R.infl.NDI-?@0 # ;
@R.infl.NDI-x@+NDI-x:@R.infl.NDI-x@0 # ;
@R.infl.NI-1@+NI-1:@R.infl.NI-1@0 # ;
@R.infl.NI-2@+NI-2:@R.infl.NI-2@0 # ;
@R.infl.NI-3@+NI-3:@R.infl.NI-3@0 # ;
@R.infl.NI-4@+NI-4:@R.infl.NI-4@0 # ;
@R.infl.NI-4w@+NI-4w:@R.infl.NI-4w@0 # ;
@R.infl.NI-5@+NI-5:@R.infl.NI-5@0 # ;
@R.infl.NI-?@+NI-?:@R.infl.NI-?@0 # ;
@R.infl.PR@+PR:@R.infl.PR@0 # ;
@R.infl.PrA@+PrA:@R.infl.PrA@0 # ;
@R.infl.PrI@+PrI:@R.infl.PrI@0 # ;
@R.infl.VAI-n@+VAI-n:@R.infl.VAI-n@0 # ;
@R.infl.VAI-v@+VAI-v:@R.infl.VAI-v@0 # ;
@R.infl.VII-n@+VII-n:@R.infl.VII-n@0 # ;
@R.infl.VII-v@+VII-v:@R.infl.VII-v@0 # ;
@R.infl.VTA-1@+VTA-1:@R.infl.VTA-1@0 # ;
@R.infl.VTA-2@+VTA-2:@R.infl.VTA-2@0 # ;
@R.infl.VTA-3@+VTA-3:@R.infl.VTA-3@0 # ;
@R.infl.VTA-4@+VTA-4:@R.infl.VTA-4@0 # ;
@R.infl.VTA-5@+VTA-5:@R.infl.VTA-5@0 # ;
@R.infl.VTI-1@+VTI-1:@R.infl.VTI-1@0 # ;
@R.infl.VTI-2@+VTI-2:@R.infl.VTI-2@0 # ;
@R.infl.VTI-3@+VTI-3:@R.infl.VTI-3@0 # ;

LEXICON Inflection
@R.infl.INM@ # ;
@R.infl.IPC@ # ;
@R.infl.IPH@ # ;
@R.infl.IPJ@ # ;
@R.infl.IPN@ # ;
@R.infl.IPP@ # ;
@R.infl.IPV@ # ;
@R.infl.NA-1@ NA ;
@R.infl.NA-2@ NA ;
@R.infl.NA-3@ NA ;
@R.infl.NA-4@ NA_SG/A_POSS/IM ;
@R.infl.NA-4w@ NA_SG/A_POSS/IM ;
@R.infl.NDA-1@ NAD ;
@R.infl.NDA-2@ NAD ;
@R.infl.NDA-3@ NAD ;
@R.infl.NDA-4@ NAD_SG/A ;
@R.infl.NDA-4w@ NAD_SG/A ;
@R.infl.NDI-1@ NID ;
@R.infl.NDI-2@ NID ;
@R.infl.NDI-3@ NID ;
@R.infl.NDI-4@ NID_SG/I ;
@R.infl.NI-1@ NI ;
@R.infl.NI-2@ NI ;
@R.infl.NI-3@ NI ;
@R.infl.NI-4@ NI_SG/I_POSS/IM ;
@R.infl.NI-4w@ NI_SG/I_POSS/IM ;
@R.infl.PR@ # ;
@R.infl.PrA@ # ;
@R.infl.PrI@ # ;
@R.infl.VAI-n@ VAIn ;
@R.infl.VAI-v@ VAIn ;
@R.infl.VII-n@ VIIn ;
@R.infl.VII-v@ VIIw ;
@R.infl.VTA-1@ VTA ;
@R.infl.VTA-2@ VTA ;
@R.infl.VTA-3@ VTA ;
@R.infl.VTA-4@ VTA ;
@R.infl.VTA-5@ VTAi ;
@R.infl.VTI-1@ VTIm ;
@R.infl.VTI-2@ VTIw ;
@R.infl.VTI-3@ VTIw ;
